exercise3/swahilli_verbs.lexc
Multichar_Symbols +N +V +PastPart +Past +PresPart +3P +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root

Prefix1 ;

LEXICON Prefix1

3SgS+:a Prefix2;
1PlS+:tʰu Prefix2;
1SgS+:ni Prefix2;
2SgS+:u Prefix2;
3PlS+:wa Prefix2;

LEXICON Prefix2

Fut+:ta Prefix3 ;
Pres+:na Prefix3 ;
Perf+:me Prefix3 ;
Past+:li Prefix3;

LEXICON Prefix3

1SgO+:ni Vinf ;
2SgO+:ku Vinf;
1PlO+:tu Vinf;
3PlO+:wa Vinf;
3SgO+:m Vinf;


LEXICON Vinf

V+: Verb;

LEXICON Verb

piga #;
penda #;
sumbua #;
lipa #;
